Washington statutes.
RCW 3.54.030

Seal.

The district court shall have a seal that shall be the vignette of George Washington, with the words "Seal of the . . . . . . District Court of . . . . . . County, State of Washington," surrounding the vignette. All process from the court runs throughout the state. The supreme court may determine by rule what process must be issued under seal.

[ 1999 c 152 s 2; 1992 c 29 s 1.]